Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1464
Mobile home park, defined.

Mobile home park shall mean a parcel or contiguous parcels of land which have been so designated and improved that the parcel or parcels contain two or more mobile home lots available to the general public for the placement thereon of mobile homes for occupancy. The term mobile home park shall not be construed to include mobile homes, buildings, tents, or other structures temporarily maintained by any individual, corporation, company, or other entity on its own premises and used exclusively to house its own labor force, and shall not include real property which is rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational purposes only and which is not intended for year-round occupancy.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 15.